src/fst/morphology/incoming/nouns_and_verbs.lexc
LEXICON PV_COUNTER
@D.pvcount@@P.pvcount.1@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.1@@P.pvcount.2@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.2@@P.pvcount.3@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.3@@P.pvcount.4@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.4@@P.pvcount.5@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.5@@P.pvcount.6@ PREVERBS ;
!@R.count1.T@@R.count1.T@ PREVERBS ; ! no longer needed, tense moved to separate lexicon

!!! Next come the Blackfoot verb stems. !!!
!!! This is where we visit verb_stems.lexc
!!! And then we return for the verb prefixes

! These are the Blackfoot verb stems.
! They are organized by their inflectional classes.

LEXICON VERB_STEMS
! LEXICON PREFIXES
@R.class.VAI@	VAI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VII@	VII_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTI@	VTI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTA@	VTA_STEMS ;
@R.pos.NOUN@	VAI_STEMS ;
@R.pos.NOUN@	VII_STEMS ;
@R.pos.NOUN@	VTI_STEMS ;
@R.pos.NOUN@	VTA_STEMS ;    
!@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@ VAI_STEMS ;
!@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@ VII_STEMS ;
!@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@ VTI_STEMS ;
!@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@ VTA_STEMS ;

LEXICON VAI
@P.class.NA@@R.pos.NOUN@+VAI:@P.class.NA@@R.pos.NOUN@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@P.class.NI@@R.pos.NOUN@+VAI:@P.class.NI@@R.pos.NOUN@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VAI_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VII
@P.class.NA@@R.pos.NOUN@+VII:@P.class.NA@@R.pos.NOUN@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@P.class.NI@@R.pos.NOUN@+VII:@P.class.NI@@R.pos.NOUN@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VII_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VTI
@P.class.NA@@R.pos.NOUN@+VTI:@P.class.NA@@R.pos.NOUN@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@P.class.NI@@R.pos.NOUN@+VTI:@P.class.NI@@R.pos.NOUN@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VTI_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VTA
@P.class.NA@@R.pos.NOUN@+VTA:@P.class.NA@@R.pos.NOUN@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@P.class.NI@@R.pos.NOUN@+VTA:@P.class.NI@@R.pos.NOUN@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VTA_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VAI_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@0                                           VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@+VAI+Der/Caus:@R.pos.VERB@%>áttsi                            VTA ;
@R.pos.VERB@+VAI+Der/Caus2:@R.pos.VERB@%>pi                              VTA ; ! Rare, give low weight
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VAI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>mo  VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VAI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>omo VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VAI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>o   VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@R.accomp.A@+VAI+Accomp:@R.pos.VERB@@R.accomp.A@%>m	         VAI_SUFFIXES ; ! -> VTA?

LEXICON VII_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VII:@R.pos.VERB@0		VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON VTI_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VTI:@R.pos.VERB@0                                           VTI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>mo  VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>omo VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>o   VTA_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON VTA_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@0                        VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTA+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>mo         VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTA+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>omo        VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTA+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>o          VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@+VTA+Der/Rflx+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@%>ohsi      VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@%>otsiiyi   VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@%>tsiiyi    VAI_SUFFIXES ;

!! from noun file

!!!!! After this, we collect the stems !!!!!

!!!!! And then we return for the suffixes

! Blackfoot Regular Noun Stems

! Below are the INDEPENDENT noun stems and their allomorphic forms (only if the allomorph is irregular). 

LEXICON NOUN_STEMS
@P.class.NA@ INDEP_NA_STEMS ;
@P.class.NI@ INDEP_NI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VAI@ INDEP_NA_STEMS ;
@R.class.VII@ INDEP_NI_STEMS ;

! When working with the lexicon, be sure to know the following lexical information:
! 1. Does it take the /-im/ suffix when possessed? If so, use NA_IM or NI_IM
! 2. Does the word take a short person prefix? If so, put %^SP at the beginning of the stem
! 3. What allomorphy does the stem undergo? If it takes oh-, put h at the beginning of the stem. If i -> o, use i3. If a -> i2, use a4. 
! If a -> o, use a3. 
! 4. Everything else should be accounted for in the phonology

! niksíssta

LEXICON DEP_STEMS
@P.class.NA@ DEP_NA_STEMS ;
@P.class.NI@ DEP_NI_STEMS ;

LEXICON DEP_NA_STEMS
! Test Stems
! nohkówa:ohkó                NAD ;
! naaáhsa:maaáhs              NAD ;
! nitána:itán                 NAD ;
! niksíssta:iksísst           NAD ;
! Full list
naaáhsa:maaáhs	NAD ;
naakiaaahsa:aakiaaahs	NAD ;
náákiima:áákiim	NAD ;
náwahkahtaana:áwahkahtaan	NAD ;
ni'sa:i's	NAD ;
ni'sohkiimaana:i'sohkiimaan	NAD ;
niihkawawa:iihkawa	NAD ;
niihsissa:iihsiss	NAD ;
nikííhtsimaana:ikííhtsimaan	NAD ;
niksimmotsiima:iksimmotsiim	NAD ;
niksíssta:iksísst	NAD ;
nikso'kowa:ikso'kowa	NAD ;
nimssa:imss	NAD ;
ninaaáhsa:inaaáhs	NAD ;
ninaapiima:inaapiim	NAD ;
ninna:inn	NAD ;
nínssta:ínsst	NAD ;
nippitaama:ippitaam	NAD ;
nisahkínaima:isahkínaim	NAD ;
nisahkómaapiima:isahkómaapiim	NAD ;
nissa:iss	NAD ;
nisskána:isskán	NAD ;
nissohkiimaana:issohkiimaan	NAD ;
nissohkowa:issohko	NAD ;
níssoko'sa:íssoko's	NAD ;
nissotana:issotan	NAD ;
nisstamowa:isstamo	NAD ;
nisstamoohkowa:isstamoohko	NAD ;
nitana:itan	NAD ;
niitsistowahsina:niitsistowahsin	NAD ;
nohkówa:ohkó	NAD ;
nohpapiiyihpa:ohpapiiyihp	NAD ;
nohpatooma:ohpatoom	NAD ;
noko'sa:oko's	NAD ;
nokoksissta:okoksisst	NAD ;
nokonna:okonn	NAD ;
nomahkinaima:omahkinaim	NAD ;
nooma:oom	NAD ;
nootoohkiimaana:ootoohkiimaan	NAD ;
nootoyooma:ootoyoom	NAD ;
noppitaama:oppitaam	NAD ;
nóta'sa:óta's	NAD ;
noyínnaawa:oyínnaa	NAD ;
nisskáni'taama:sskáni'taam	NAD ;
niyiihkowa:yiihkowa	NAD ;

LEXICON DEP_NI_STEMS
nookóówayi:ookóówan     NID ;
nookóówayi:ookóówa     NID ;

LEXICON NA
@P.class.NA@@R.pos.NOUN@+NA:@P.class.NA@@R.pos.NOUN@0  IM ;
@R.class.VAI@+NA+Der/VAI+VAI:@R.class.VAI@0 N_VAI_SUFFIXES  ; 

LEXICON NA_IM
@P.im.IM@@P.pos.NA@@R.pos.NOUN@+NA:@P.im.IM@@P.class.NA@@R.pos.NOUN@  IM ;
@R.class.VAI@+NA+Der/VAI+VAI:@R.class.VAI@0 N_VAI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI
@P.class.NI@@R.pos.NOUN@+NI:@P.class.NI@@R.pos.NOUN@0  IM ;
@R.class.VII@+NI+Der/VII+VII:@R.class.VII@0 N_VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI_IM
@P.im.IM@@P.class.NI@@R.pos.NOUN@+NI:@P.im.IM@@P.class.NI@@R.pos.NOUN@0  IM ;
@R.class.VII@+NI+Der/VII+VII:@R.class.VII@0 N_VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NAD
@P.class.NA@+NAD:@P.class.NA@0 POSS_NUM ;

LEXICON NID
@P.class.NI@+NID:@P.class.NI@0 POSS_NUM ;

!! from verb file

! BELOW ARE THE VAI SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON VAI_SUFFIXES
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@ INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@ CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@ SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IRR@+Irr:@R.mode.IRR@ UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IMP@+Imp:@R.mode.IMP@ IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON PREVERBS
0 VERB_STEMS ;
0 NOUN_STEMS ;
LEXICON VAI_STEMS
i'sohkoohsi:i2'sohkoohsi	VAI ;
ikahkainnimaa:i2kahkainnimaa	VAI ;
ikkskssi:i2kkskssi	VAI ;
iksistohsoyi:i2ksistohsoyi	VAI ;
inihki:i2nihki	VAI ;
ipi'ka'pssi:i2pi'ka'pssi	VAI ;
ipottaa:i2pottaa	VAI ;
istta'tsi:i2stta'tsi	VAI ;
itotoisskskanii:itotoisskskanii	VAI ;
niitsowá'pssi:niitsowá'pssi	VAI ;
ohkano'tsisii:ohkano'tsisii	VAI ;
ohpi'si:ohpi'si	VAI ;
okamo'ta'pssi:okamo'ta'pssi	VAI ;
omsspika'pssi:omsspika'pssi	VAI ;
otaimi:otaimi	VAI ;
saipokomsstsimaa:saipokomsstsimaa	VAI ;
sayippoma'pssi:sayippoma'pssi	VAI ;
sopowatsistotoohsi:sopowatsistotoohsi	VAI ;
sspssi:i2sspssi	VAI ;
waahso:waahso	VAI ;
waapitsíkamaa:waapitsíkamaa	VAI ;
wayami'tsim:wayami'tsim	VAI ;
yiniyi'taki:yi2niyi'taki	VAI ;
ikaisínaaki:i2kaisínaaki	VAI ;
ohkotaki:hkotaki	VAI ;
waoo'tokiaaki:waoo'tokiaaki	VAI ;
LEXICON VII_STEMS
aawoyihtsi:aawoyihtsi	VII ;
i'ksskii:i'ksskii	VII ;
i'táámiksistsiko:i2'táámiksistsiko	VII ;
iiso:iiso	VII ;
ikkaniksoohpi'yi:i2kkaniksoohpi'yi	VII ;
iksikka'pii:iksikka'pii	VII ;
immi:i2mmi	VII ;
ipahksimo:i2pahksimo	VII ;
ipiiyinaattsi:i2piiyinaattsi	VII ;
isinata'pii:i2sinata'pii	VII ;
isttsíkssaakokotaahko:i2sttsíkssaakokotaahko	VII ;
iyoomokihtsi:iyoomokihtsi	VII ;
miyiko:miyiko	VII ;
o'kakóyi:o'kakóyi	VII ;
o'tstsii:o'tstsii	VII ;
ohpokohtssi:ohpokohtssi	VII ;
omatapihtsii:omatapihtsii	VII ;
pi'ka'pii:pi'ka'pii	VII ;
sapa'pii:sapa'pii	VII ;
sikkotsi:sikkotsi	VII ;
sskaa:sskaa	VII ;
sstsííwa'si:sstsííwa'si	VII ;
waana'si:waana'si	VII ;
waatsistoihtsii:waatsistoihtsii	VII ;
yissksaana'pii:yi2ssksaana'pii	VII ;
LEXICON VTI_STEMS
i'nohtoo:i'nohtoo	VTI ;
ihkihsi:ihkihsi	VTI ;
iiyika'kimatoo:iiyika'kimatoo	VTI ;
ikawohpattsii:i2kawohpattsii	VTI ;
ikkakoyisstoo:i2kkakoyisstoo	VTI ;
iksikká'pistotsi:iksikká'pistotsi	VTI ;
iksistsikomatoo:i2ksistsikomatoo	VTI ;
inai'tsi:inai'tsi	VTI ;
innoohtoo:innoohtoo	VTI ;
ipáóotskihtsi:i2páóotskihtsi	VTI ;
ipo'tstoo:i2po'tstoo	VTI ;
ippotsipi:i2ppotsipi	VTI ;
isttohkohtoo:i2sttohkohtoo	VTI ;
ma'tsi:ma'tsi	VTI ;
ohpattsski:hpattsski	VTI ;
omai'tsi:omai'tsi	VTI ;
opaksiststoo:opaksiststoo	VTI ;
oy'ssatoo:oy'ssatoo	VTI ;
sápomatoo:sápomatoo	VTI ;
sisiksino'tsi:sisiksino'tsi	VTI ;
ssinni:ssinni	VTI ;
stsiyi'tsi:stsiyi'tsi	VTI ;
waapatsi'tsi:waapatsi'tsi	VTI ;
yáakai'piksi:yáakai'piksi	VTI ;
yisstsiiwakatoo:yisstsiiwakatoo	VTI ;
LEXICON VTA_STEMS
i'powatomo:i2'powatomo	VTA ;
iiyikssko:i2iyikssko	VTA ;
iki'tsiihtsi:i2ki'tsiihtsi	VTA ;
ikohtoma't:i2kohtoma't	VTA ;
iksisttonit:i2ksisttonit	VTA ;
inikkihka'sat:i2nikkihka'sat	VTA ;
ipanínnat:i2panínnat	VTA ;
ipisttotskohto:i2pisttotskohto	VTA ;
ippotsipist:i2ppotsipist	VTA ;
istawat:i2stawat	VTA ;
isttsítsskim:i2sttsítsskim	VTA ;
niitsí'to:niitsí'to	VTA ;
ohkoyimm:ohkoyimm	VTA ;
ohsoto'kino:ohsoto'kino	VTA ;
okoowat:okoowat	VTA ;
ommo:ommo	VTA ;
ooyiistoto:i2oyiistoto	VTA ;
otawanss:otawanss	VTA ;
saan:saan	VTA ;
sapohtomo:sapohtomo	VTA ;
sistsikaaattsi:sistsikaaattsi	VTA ;
ssksimat:ssksimat	VTA ;
waahko'sskat:waahko'sskat	VTA ;
wai'pohto:wai'pohto	VTA ;
yookowat:yookowat	VTA ;
LEXICON INDEP_NA_STEMS
stamika:%^SPstamik	NA_IM ;
soohksiisiimsstaana:%^SPsoohksiisiimsstaan	NA ;
sikohkiaayowa:%^SPsikohkiaayo	NA ;
sa'áíwa:%^SPsa'áí	NA ;
póósa:hpóós	NA_IM ;
ponokáwa:innoka NA_IM ;
ponokáómitaawa:innokáómitaa NA_IM ;
pí'kihtaana:pí'kihtaan	NA ;
omahkátoyiiki'somiaato'sa:omahkátoyiiki'sommiaato's	NA ;
óóhkotoka:óóhkotok	NA_IM ;
otahkoiimiwa:otahkoiimi	NA ;
omahksikaapiikoana:omahksikaapiikoan	NA ;
ohkiimaana:ohkiimaan	NA ;
náísttooyiiksikkssooa'tsisa:náísttooyiiksikkssooa'tsis	NA ;
miaawaahpitsiiwa:miaawaahpitsii	NA ;
mí'ksskimiksísoyiwa:mí'ksskimmiksísoyi	NA ;
máakááhkima'tsisa:máakááhkima'tsis	NA ;
kottonaa'wa:kottonaa'	NA ;
ksaahkoma:ksaahkomm	NA ;
kiááyowa:hkiááyo	NA_IM ;
katsiiksiwa:katsiiksi	NA ;
iihtsipáítapiiyo'pa:iihtsipáítapiiyo'p	NA ;
isska:issk	NA ;
imitááwa:i3mitáá	NA_IM ;
imitaikoana:i3mitaikoan	NA_IM ;
ikohkiaapittaa'tsisa:ikohkiaapittaa'tsis	NA ;
iitawáakohsimao'pa:iitawáakohsimao'p	NA ;
iiníwa:iiníí	NA_IM ;
iihtáíssáakio'pa:i3htáíssáakio'p	NA ;
i'ksisakoma:i'ksisakomm	NA ;
áókakihtsimaawa:áókakihtsimaa	NA ;
áípakkohtama:áípakkohtamm	NA ;
áwatoyiwa:áwatoyi	NA ;
áótahkááokayisa:áótahkááokayis NA_IM ;
aiksisstoomatapisttsipatakkayayiwa:aiksisstoomatapisttsipatakkayayi	NA ;
aiksiniwa:aiksini NA_IM ;
LEXICON INDEP_NI_STEMS
soyoopoki:soyoopok	NI ;
si'kimaikahtssini:si'kimaikahtssin	NI ;
soyóóhpawahkoyi:soyóóhpawahko	NI ;
pííhkoohtsiyi:pííhkoohtsi	NI ;
páyooyi:hpáyoo	NI_IM ;
pani'kahtaa'tsisi:%^SPi2pani'kahtaa'tsis	NI ;
ó'psskaani:ó'psskaan	NI ;
oohkotoksaisiksikimiyi:oohkotoksaisiksikimi	NI ;
owa'si:owa's	NI ;
ohkini:%^SPohkin	NI ;
ni'tsitáísaipoyiyi:ni'tsitáísaipoyi	NI ;
matsináwaisstaami:matsináwaisstaam	NI ;
moápahkisi:%^SPmoápahkis	NI ;
misisayi:misisa	NI ;
máíipssimi:máíipssim	NI ;
ksstakssini:ksstakssin	NI ;
koopiisopoyi:koopiisopo	NI ;
kaatsiyi:kaatsi	NI ;
i'nakohpomaiksistsikoyi:i'nakohpommaiksistsiko	NI ;
isstssimááni:i2sstssimáán	NI ;
issikihtatsikiaiksistsikoyi:issikihtatsikiaiksistsiko	NI ;
iitáísííkaaso'pi:iitáísííkaaso'p	NI ;
i'pahkoyi:i2'pahko	NI ;
atowáa'tsisi:a3towáa'tsis	NI ;
aatakoyi:aatako	NI ;
